West Virginia, session 2026, HB5626.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2.  POWERS AND DUTIES OF PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION. §24-2-4a.  Procedure for Changing Rates After June 30, 1981. (a) After June 30, 1981, no public utility subject to this chapter, except for water and/or sewer utilities that are political subdivisions of the state providing separate or combined services and having at least 4,500 customers and annual gross revenue of $3 million or more from its separate or combined services, shall change, suspend, or annul any rate, joint rate, charge, rental, or classification except after 30 days' notice to the commission and the public, which notice shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made in the schedule then in force and the time when the changed rates or charges shall go into effect; but the commission may enter an order suspending the proposed rate as hereinafter provided. The proposed changes shall be shown by printing new schedules, or shall be plainly indicated upon the schedules in force at the time, and kept open to public inspection: Provided, That the commission may, in its discretion, and for good cause shown, allow changes upon less time than the notice herein specified, or may modify the requirements of this section in respect to publishing, posting and filing of tariffs, either by particular instructions or by general order.(b) Whenever there is filed with the commission any schedule stating a change in the rates or charges, or joint rates or charges, or stating a new individual or joint rate or charge or joint classification or any new individual or joint regulation or practice affecting any rate or charge, the commission may, either upon complaint or upon its own initiative without complaint, enter upon a hearing concerning the propriety of the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice; and, if the commission so orders, it may proceed without answer or other form of pleading by the interested parties, but upon reasonable notice, and, pending the hearing and the decisions thereon, the commission, upon filing with the schedule and delivering to the public utility affected thereby a statement in writing of its reasons for the suspension, may suspend the operation of the schedule and defer the use of the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice, but not for a longer period than 270 days beyond the time when the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice would otherwise go into effect; and after full hearing, whether completed before or after the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice goes into effect, the commission may make the order in reference to the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice as would be proper in a proceeding initiated after the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice had become effective: Provided, That in the case of a public utility having 2,500 customers or less and which is not a political subdivision and which is not principally owned by any other public utility corporation or public utility holding corporation, the commission may suspend the operation of the schedule and defer the use of the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice, but not for a longer period than 120 days beyond the time when the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice would otherwise go into effect; and in the case of a public utility having more than 2,500 customers, but not more than 5,000 customers, and which is not a political subdivision and which is not principally owned by any other public utility corporation or public utility holding corporation, the commission may suspend the operation of the schedule and defer the use of the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice, but not for a longer period than 150 days beyond the time when the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice would otherwise go into effect; and in the case of a public utility having more than 5,000 customers, but not more than 7,500 customers, and which is not a political subdivision and which is not principally owned by any other public utility corporation or public utility holding corporation, the commission may suspend the operation of the schedule and defer the use of the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice, but not for a longer period than 180 days beyond the time when the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice would otherwise go into effect; and after full hearing, whether completed before or after the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice goes into effect, the commission may make the order in reference to the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice as would be proper in a proceeding initiated after the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice had become effective: Provided, however, That, in the case of rates established or proposed that increase by less than 25 percent of the gross revenue of the regulated public service district, there shall be no suspension period in the case of rates established by a public service district pursuant to §16-13A-9 of this code and the proposed rates of public service districts shall go into effect upon the date of filing with the commission, subject to refund modification at the conclusion of the commission proceeding. In the case of rates established or proposed that increase by more than 25 percent of the gross revenue of the public service district, the district may apply for, and the commission may grant, a waiver of the suspension period and allow rates to be effective upon the date of filing with the commission. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (e) (f) of this section, the public service district shall provide notice by Class I legal advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in its service territory of the percentage increase in rates at least 14 days prior to the effective date of the increased rates. Any refund determined to be due and owing as a result of any difference between any final rates approved by the commission and the rates placed into effect subject to refund shall be refunded by the public service district as a credit against each customer's account for a period of up to six months after entry of the commission's final order. Any remaining balance which is not fully credited by credit within six months after entry of the commission's final order shall be directly refunded to the customer by check: Provided further, That if any such hearing and decision thereon is not concluded within the periods of suspension, as above stated, the rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice shall go into effect at the end of the period not subject to refund: And provided further, That if any such rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice goes into effect because of the failure of the commission to reach a decision, the same shall not preclude the commission from rendering a decision with respect thereto which would disapprove, reduce, or modify any such proposed rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice, in whole or in part, but any such disapproval, reduction, or modification shall not be deemed to require a refund to the customers of the utility as to any rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice so disapproved, reduced, or modified. The fact of any rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice going into effect by reason of the commission's failure to act thereon does not affect the commission's power and authority to subsequently act with respect to any such application or change in any rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice. Any rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice which shall be approved, disapproved, modified or changed, in whole or in part, by decision of the commission shall remain in effect as so approved, disapproved, modified, or changed during the period or pendency of any subsequent hearing thereon or appeal therefrom. Orders of the commission affecting rates, charges, classifications, regulations, or practices which have gone into effect automatically at the end of the of the suspension period are prospective in effect.(c) At any hearing involving a rate sought to be increased or involving the change of any rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice, the burden of proof to show the justness and reasonableness of the increased rate or proposed increased rate, or the proposed change of rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice shall be upon the public utility making application for the change. The commission shall, whenever practicable and within budgetary constraints, conduct one or more public hearings within the area served by the public utility making application for the increase or change, for the purpose of obtaining comments and evidence on the matter from local ratepayers.(d) Each public utility subject to the provisions of this section shall be required to establish, in a written report which shall be incorporated into each general rate case application, that it has thoroughly investigated and considered the emerging and state-of-the-art concepts in the utility management, rate design, and conservation as reported by the commission under § 24-1-1(c) of this code as alternatives to, or in mitigation of, any rate increase.  The utility report shall contain as to each concept considered the reasons for adoption or rejection of each.  When in any case pending before the commission all evidence shall have been taken and the hearing completed, the commission shall render a decision in the case. The failure of the commission to render a decision with respect to any such proposed change in any such rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice within the various time periods specified in this section after the application therefor shall constitute neglect of duty on the part of the commission and each member thereof.(e) For purposes of this section, "Future Test Year" is the 12 consecutive-month period beginning with the first month that the new rates will be in effect after the tolling of the applicable suspension period.  The commission shall utilize Future Test Year levels of costs, revenue, and the average rate base of the Future Test Year in the determination of a utility’s rates if the utility elects to utilize a Future Test Year.  The utility’s proposed rate base calculation shall include either a percentage of the construction work in progress in rate base or allowances for funds used during construction which the commission shall include in rate base for purpose of calculating new rates: Provided, That the commission shall promulgate rules pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to prescribe support for projections presented by a utility as part of a Future Test Year and other information necessary to evaluate the reasonableness of the projections.  (e) (f) Other than as provided in subsection (b) of this section relating to public service districts, where more than 20 members of the public are affected by a proposed change in rates, it shall be a sufficient notice to the public within the meaning of this section if the notice is published as a Class II legal advertisement in compliance with §59-3-1 et seq. of this code and the publication area for the publication shall be the community where the majority of the resident members of the public affected by the change reside or, in case of nonresidents, have their principal place of business within this state.(f) (g) The commission may order rates into effect subject to refund, plus interest in the discretion of the commission, in cases in which the commission determines that a temporary or interim rate increase is necessary for the utility to avoid financial distress, or in which the costs upon which these rates are based are subject to modification by the commission or another regulatory commission and to refund to the public utility. In that case the commission may require the public utility to enter into a bond in an amount deemed by the commission to be reasonable and conditioned upon the refund to the persons or parties entitled thereto of the amount of the excess if the rates so put into effect are subsequently determined to be higher than those finally fixed for the utility.(g) (h) No utility regulated under the provisions of this section may make application for a general rate increase while another general rate application is pending before the commission and not finally acted upon, except pursuant to the provisions of subsection (e) (f) of this section. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed so as to prohibit any such rate application from being made while a previous application which has been finally acted upon by the commission is pending before or upon appeal to the West Virginia Supreme Court of Appeals.